Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5664
Financial incentives; commission; considerations.

In screening applicants for financial incentives, the commission shall consider the following factors:

(1) Motivation to practice in a health profession shortage area in Nebraska;

(2) Motivation and preference toward an approved specialty; and

(3) Other factors that would influence a choice to practice in a health profession shortage area in Nebraska.

The commission shall select recipients who are most likely to practice in a health profession shortage area in Nebraska.

Laws 1991, LB 400, § 15;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 61;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 52.